Illinois, session 104th, HB3458.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12-3.05 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.05)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-4)7    Sec. 12-3.05. Aggravated battery. 8    (a) Offense based on injury. A person commits aggravated 9battery when, in committing a battery, other than by the 10discharge of a firearm, he or she knowingly does any of the 11following:12        (1) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 13    or disfigurement.14        (2) Causes severe and permanent disability, great 15    bodily harm, or disfigurement by means of a caustic or 16    flammable substance, a poisonous gas, a deadly biological 17    or chemical contaminant or agent, a radioactive substance, 18    or a bomb or explosive compound.19        (3) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 20    or disfigurement to an individual whom the person knows to 21    be a peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 22    private security officer, correctional institution 23    employee, or Department of Human Services employee   HB3458- 2 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1    supervising or controlling sexually dangerous persons or 2    sexually violent persons:3            (i) performing his or her official duties;4            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 5        official duties; or6            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 7        or her official duties.8        (4) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 9    or disfigurement to an individual 60 years of age or 10    older.11        (5) Strangles another individual. 12    (b) Offense based on injury to a child or person with an 13intellectual disability. A person who is at least 18 years of 14age commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, 15he or she knowingly and without legal justification by any 16means:17        (1) causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 18    or disfigurement to any child under the age of 13 years, or 19    to any person with a severe or profound intellectual 20    disability; or21        (2) causes bodily harm or disability or disfigurement 22    to any child under the age of 13 years or to any person 23    with a severe or profound intellectual disability. 24    (c) Offense based on location of conduct. A person commits 25aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 26by the discharge of a firearm, he or she is or the person   HB3458- 3 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1battered is on or about a public way, public property, a public 2place of accommodation or amusement, a sports venue, or a 3domestic violence shelter, or in a church, synagogue, mosque, 4or other building, structure, or place used for religious 5worship.6    (d) Offense based on status of victim. A person commits 7aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 8by discharge of a firearm, he or she knows the individual 9battered to be any of the following:10        (1) A person 60 years of age or older.11        (2) A person who is pregnant or has a physical 12    disability.13        (3) A teacher or school employee upon school grounds 14    or grounds adjacent to a school or in any part of a 15    building used for school purposes.16        (4) A peace officer, community policing volunteer, 17    fireman, private security officer, correctional 18    institution employee, or Department of Human Services 19    employee supervising or controlling sexually dangerous 20    persons or sexually violent persons:21            (i) performing his or her official duties;22            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 23        official duties; or24            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 25        or her official duties.26        (5) A judge, emergency management worker, emergency   HB3458- 4 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1    medical services personnel, or utility worker:2            (i) performing his or her official duties;3            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 4        official duties; or5            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 6        or her official duties.7        (6) An officer or employee of the State of Illinois, a 8    unit of local government, or a school district, while 9    performing his or her official duties.10        (7) A transit employee performing his or her official 11    duties, or a transit passenger.12        (8) A taxi driver on duty.13        (9) A merchant who detains the person for an alleged 14    commission of retail theft under Section 16-26 of this 15    Code and the person without legal justification by any 16    means causes bodily harm to the merchant.17        (10) A person authorized to serve process under 18    Section 2-202 of the Code of Civil Procedure or a special 19    process server appointed by the circuit court while that 20    individual is in the performance of his or her duties as a 21    process server.22        (11) A nurse while in the performance of his or her 23    duties as a nurse. 24        (12) A merchant: (i) while performing his or her 25    duties, including, but not limited to, relaying directions 26    for healthcare or safety from his or her supervisor or   HB3458- 5 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1    employer or relaying health or safety guidelines, 2    recommendations, regulations, or rules from a federal, 3    State, or local public health agency; and (ii) during a 4    disaster declared by the Governor, or a state of emergency 5    declared by the mayor of the municipality in which the 6    merchant is located, due to a public health emergency and 7    for a period of 6 months after such declaration. 8    (d-1) It is a defense to aggravated battery when the 9individual battered is a peace officer and the officer 10responded to an incident in which the officer interacted with 11a person whom a reasonable officer could believe was having a 12mental health episode and the person with whom the officer 13interacted has a documented mental illness and acted abruptly. 14    (e) Offense based on use of a firearm. A person commits 15aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he or she 16knowingly does any of the following:17        (1) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 18    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 19    to another person.20        (2) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 21    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 22    to a person he or she knows to be a peace officer, 23    community policing volunteer, person summoned by a police 24    officer, fireman, private security officer, correctional 25    institution employee, or emergency management worker:26            (i) performing his or her official duties;  HB3458- 6 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 2        official duties; or3            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 4        or her official duties.5        (3) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 6    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 7    to a person he or she knows to be emergency medical 8    services personnel:9            (i) performing his or her official duties;10            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 11        official duties; or12            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 13        or her official duties.14        (4) Discharges a firearm and causes any injury to a 15    person he or she knows to be a teacher, a student in a 16    school, or a school employee, and the teacher, student, or 17    employee is upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a 18    school or in any part of a building used for school 19    purposes.20        (5) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 21    with a silencer, and causes any injury to another person.22        (6) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 23    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 24    she knows to be a peace officer, community policing 25    volunteer, person summoned by a police officer, fireman, 26    private security officer, correctional institution   HB3458- 7 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1    employee or emergency management worker:2            (i) performing his or her official duties;3            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 4        official duties; or5            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 6        or her official duties.7        (7) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 8    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 9    she knows to be emergency medical services personnel:10            (i) performing his or her official duties;11            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 12        official duties; or13            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 14        or her official duties.15        (8) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 16    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 17    she knows to be a teacher, or a student in a school, or a 18    school employee, and the teacher, student, or employee is 19    upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a school or in 20    any part of a building used for school purposes. 21    (f) Offense based on use of a weapon or device. A person 22commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he 23or she does any of the following:24        (1) Uses a deadly weapon other than by discharge of a 25    firearm, or uses an air rifle as defined in Section 26    24.8-0.1 of this Code.  HB3458- 8 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1        (2) Wears a hood, robe, or mask to conceal his or her 2    identity.3        (3) Knowingly and without lawful justification shines 4    or flashes a laser gunsight or other laser device attached 5    to a firearm, or used in concert with a firearm, so that 6    the laser beam strikes upon or against the person of 7    another.8        (4) Knowingly video or audio records the offense with 9    the intent to disseminate the recording. 10    (g) Offense based on certain conduct. A person commits 11aggravated battery when, other than by discharge of a firearm, 12he or she does any of the following:13        (1) Violates Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 14    Substances Act by unlawfully delivering a controlled 15    substance to another and any user experiences great bodily 16    harm or permanent disability as a result of the injection, 17    inhalation, or ingestion of any amount of the controlled 18    substance.19        (2) Knowingly administers to an individual or causes 20    him or her to take, without his or her consent or by threat 21    or deception, and for other than medical purposes, any 22    intoxicating, poisonous, stupefying, narcotic, 23    anesthetic, or controlled substance, or gives to another 24    person any food containing any substance or object 25    intended to cause physical injury if eaten.26        (3) Knowingly causes or attempts to cause a   HB3458- 9 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1    correctional institution employee or Department of Human 2    Services employee to come into contact with blood, seminal 3    fluid, urine, or feces by throwing, tossing, or expelling 4    the fluid or material, and the person is an inmate of a 5    penal institution or is a sexually dangerous person or 6    sexually violent person in the custody of the Department 7    of Human Services.8    (h) Sentence. Unless otherwise provided, aggravated 9battery is a Class 3 felony.10    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(4), 11(d)(4), or (g)(3) is a Class 2 felony.12    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(3) or 13(g)(1) is a Class 1 felony.14    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 15Class 1 felony when the aggravated battery was intentional and 16involved the infliction of torture, as defined in paragraph 17(10) of subsection (b-5) of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code 18of Corrections, as the infliction of or subjection to extreme 19physical pain, motivated by an intent to increase or prolong 20the pain, suffering, or agony of the victim. 21    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 22Class 2 felony when the person causes great bodily harm or 23permanent disability to an individual whom the person knows to 24be a member of a congregation engaged in prayer or other 25religious activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or other 26building, structure, or place used for religious worship.   HB3458- 10 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1    Aggravated battery under subdivision (a)(5) is a Class 1 2felony if:3        (A) the person used or attempted to use a dangerous 4    instrument while committing the offense;5        (B) the person caused great bodily harm or permanent 6    disability or disfigurement to the other person while 7    committing the offense; or8        (C) the person has been previously convicted of a 9    violation of subdivision (a)(5) under the laws of this 10    State or laws similar to subdivision (a)(5) of any other 11    state. 12    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(1) is a 13Class X felony.14    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(2) is a 15Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 16of imprisonment of a minimum of 6 years and a maximum of 45 17years.18    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(5) is a 19Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 20of imprisonment of a minimum of 12 years and a maximum of 45 21years.22    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(2), 23(e)(3), or (e)(4) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 24be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 15 years 25and a maximum of 60 years.26    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(6),   HB3458- 11 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1(e)(7), or (e)(8) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 2be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 20 years 3and a maximum of 60 years.4    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (b)(1) is a 5Class X felony, except that:6        (1) if the person committed the offense while armed 7    with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to the term of 8    imprisonment imposed by the court;9        (2) if, during the commission of the offense, the 10    person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall be 11    added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;12        (3) if, during the commission of the offense, the 13    person personally discharged a firearm that proximately 14    caused great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 15    disfigurement, or death to another person, 25 years or up 16    to a term of natural life shall be added to the term of 17    imprisonment imposed by the court.18    (i) Definitions. In this Section:19    "Building or other structure used to provide shelter" has 20the meaning ascribed to "shelter" in Section 1 of the Domestic 21Violence Shelters Act.22    "Domestic violence" has the meaning ascribed to it in 23Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.24    "Domestic violence shelter" means any building or other 25structure used to provide shelter or other services to victims 26or to the dependent children of victims of domestic violence   HB3458- 12 -LRB104 08642 RLC 18695 b1pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or the 2Domestic Violence Shelters Act, or any place within 500 feet 3of such a building or other structure in the case of a person 4who is going to or from such a building or other structure.5    "Firearm" has the meaning provided under Section 1.1 of 6the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, and does not 7include an air rifle as defined by Section 24.8-0.1 of this 8Code. 9    "Machine gun" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1024-1 of this Code.11    "Merchant" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1216-0.1 of this Code. 13    "Strangle" means intentionally impeding the normal 14breathing or circulation of the blood of an individual by 15applying pressure on the throat or neck of that individual or 16by blocking the nose or mouth of that individual. 17(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.)